fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-ciman_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - cîmân - ok : # -m inanimate noun, canoe AEW NI1
     cîmân+N+I+Sg: cîmân
     cîmân+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nicîmân
     cîmân+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kicîmân
     cîmân+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nicîmâninân
     cîmân+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg: kicîmâninaw
     cîmân+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kicîmâniwâw
     cîmân+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: ocîmân
     cîmân+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: ocîmâniwâw
     cîmân+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: ocîmâniyiw

     cîmân+N+I+Pl: cîmâna
     cîmân+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nicîmâna
     cîmân+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kicîmâna
     cîmân+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nicîmâninâna
     cîmân+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl: kicîmâninawa
     cîmân+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kicîmâniwâwa
     cîmân+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: ocîmâna
     cîmân+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: ocîmâniwâwa
     cîmân+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: ocîmâniyiwa

     cîmân+N+I+Loc: cîmânihk
     cîmân+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: nicîmânihk
     cîmân+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: kicîmânihk
     cîmân+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: nicîmâninâhk
     cîmân+N+I+Px21Pl+Loc: kicîmâninâhk
     cîmân+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: kicîmâniwâhk
     cîmân+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: ocîmânihk
     cîmân+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: ocîmâniwâhk
     cîmân+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: ocîmâniyihk

     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg:          [cîmânis,         cîmânisis]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg:    [nicîmânis,       nicîmânisis]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg:    [kicîmânis,       kicîmânisis]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg:    [nicîmânisinân,   nicîmânisisinân]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg:   [kicîmânisinaw,   kicîmânisisinaw]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg:    [kicîmânisiwâw,   kicîmânisisiwâw]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg:    [ocîmânis,        ocîmânisis]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg:    [ocîmânisiwâw,    ocîmânisisiwâw]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg: [ocîmânisiyiw,    ocîmânisisiyiw]

     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl:          [cîmânisa,       cîmânisisa]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl:    [nicîmânisa,     nicîmânisisa]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl:    [kicîmânisa,     kicîmânisisa]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl:    [nicîmânisinâna, nicîmânisisinâna]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl:   [kicîmânisinawa, kicîmânisisinawa]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl:    [kicîmânisiwâwa, kicîmânisisiwâwa]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl:    [ocîmânisa,      ocîmânisisa]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl:    [ocîmânisiwâwa,  ocîmânisisiwâwa]
     cîmân+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl: [ocîmânisiyiwa,  ocîmânisisiyiwa]
